Utah statutes.
78B-12-208.   Joint physical custody -- Obligation calculations.
In cases of joint physical custody, the base child support award shall be
determined as follows:
(1)  Combine the adjusted gross incomes of the parents and determine the base
combined child support obligation using the base combined child support
obligation table.
(2)  Calculate each parent's proportionate share of the base combined child
support obligation by multiplying the base combined child support obligation
by each parent's percentage of combined adjusted gross income.  The amounts so
calculated are the base child support obligation due from each parent for
support of the children.
(3)  If the obligor's time with the children exceeds 110 overnights, the
obligation shall be calculated further as follows:
(a)  if the amount of time to be spent with the children is between 110 and
131 overnights, multiply the number of overnights over 110 by .0027, then
multiply the result by the base combined child support obligation, and then
subtract the result from the obligor's payment as determined by Subsection (2)
to arrive at the obligor's payment; or
(b)  if the amount of time to be spent with the children is 131 overnights or
more, multiply the number of overnights over 130 by .0084, then multiply the
result by the base combined child support obligation, and then subtract the
result from the obligor's payment as determined in Subsection (3)(a) to arrive
at the obligor's payment.
